Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202585-2303
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the In the Line of Duty Dependent Education Act:

(1) Associate degree program means a degree program at a community college, state college, or state university which typically requires completion of an organized program of study of at least sixty semester credit hours or an equivalent that can be shown to accomplish the same goal. Associate degree program does not include a baccalaureate degree program;

(2) Baccalaureate degree program means a degree program at a community college, state college, or state university which typically requires completion of an organized program of study of at least one hundred twenty semester credit hours or an equivalent that can be shown to accomplish the same goal;

(3) Child means a resident or nonresident of Nebraska who is the child by birth or adoption or the stepchild of a Nebraska law enforcement officer killed in the line of duty or a Nebraska firefighter killed in the line of duty;

(4) Community college means a public postsecondary educational institution which is part of the community college system and includes all branches and campuses of such institution located within the State of Nebraska;

(5) Education benefit means the In the Line of Duty Dependent Education Benefit established under section 85-2304;

(6) Fatal injury means an event occurring in the line of duty which is a proximate cause of the death of a law enforcement officer or firefighter;

(7) Firefighter means a member of a paid or volunteer fire department in Nebraska, including a member of a rescue squad associated with a paid or volunteer fire department in Nebraska, and a member of an emergency medical services ambulance squad;

(8) Law enforcement officer means any person who is responsible for the prevention or detection of crime or the enforcement of the penal, traffic, or highway laws of the State of Nebraska or any political subdivision of the state for more than one hundred hours per year and who is authorized by law to make arrests;

(9) Line of duty means any action that a Nebraska law enforcement officer or firefighter is authorized or obligated by law, rule, or regulation to perform, related to or as a condition of employment or service;

(10) State college means a public postsecondary educational institution which is part of the Nebraska state college system and includes all branches and campuses of such institution located within the State of Nebraska;

(11) State university means a public postsecondary educational institution which is part of the University of Nebraska and includes all branches and campuses of such institution located within the State of Nebraska;

(12) Tuition and fees means the charges and cost of tuition and fees as set by the governing body of a state university, state college, or community college; and

(13) Volunteer fire department means a volunteer department as defined in section 35-1303 located in Nebraska which provides fire protection services within Nebraska.

Laws 2009, LB206, § 3;

Laws 2025, LB335, § 1.